California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and only for purposes of the credit allowed in subdivision (k), in the case of a television series described in clause (iii) or clause (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (18) of subdivision (b), up to one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000).

(iv) In the case of an independent film, up to ten million dollars
 ($10,000,000).

(4) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), the applicable credit percentage shall be:

(A) Twenty percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California, including, but not limited to, a feature or a television series that relocated to California that is in its second or subsequent years of receiving a tax credit allocation pursuant to this section, Section 17053.85, or Section 17053.95.

(B) Twenty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California where the qualified motion picture is a television series that relocated to California in its first year of receiving a tax credit allocation pursuant to this section.

(C) Twenty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture that is an independent film.

(D) Additional credits shall be allowed for the production of a qualified motion picture whose applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (A), in an aggregate amount not to exceed 5 percent of the qualified expenditures under that subparagraph, as follows:

(i) (I) Five percent of qualified expenditures, excluding qualified wages described in subparagraph (E), relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone.

(II) For purposes of this clause and subparagraph (E):

(ia) “Applicable period” means the period that commences with preproduction and
 ends when original photography concludes. The applicable period includes the time necessary to strike a remote location and return to the Los Angeles zone.

(ib) “Los Angeles zone” means the area within a circle 30 miles in radius from Beverly Boulevard and La Cienega Boulevard, Los Angeles, California, and includes Agua Dulce, Castaic, including Castaic Lake, Leo Carrillo State Beach, Ontario International Airport, Piru, and Pomona, including the Los Angeles County Fairgrounds. The Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer, Inc. Conejo Ranch property is within the Los Angeles zone.

(ic) “Original photography” includes principal photography and reshooting original footage.

(id) “Qualified expenditures relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone” means amounts paid or incurred during the applicable period for tangible
 personal property purchased or leased and used or consumed outside the Los Angeles zone and relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone and qualified wages paid for services performed outside the Los Angeles zone and relating to original photography outside the Los Angeles zone.

(ii) Five percent of the qualified expenditures relating to qualified visual effects attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California.

(E) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), an amount equal to 10 percent of qualified wages paid for services performed relating to original photography outside of the Los Angeles zone to qualified individuals who reside in California but outside the Los Angeles zone shall be allowed as an additional credit for the production of a qualified motion picture whose applicable credit percentage is determined
 pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(ii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), an amount equal to 5 percent of qualified wages paid for services performed relating to original photography outside of the Los Angeles zone to qualified individuals who reside in California but outside the Los Angeles zone shall be allowed as an additional credit for the production of a qualified motion picture whose applicable credit percentage is determined pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C).

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Ancillary product” means any article for sale to the public that contains a portion of, or any element of, the qualified motion picture.

(2) “Budget” means an estimate of all expenses paid or incurred during the production period of a qualified motion
 picture. It shall be the same budget used by the qualified taxpayer and production company for all qualified motion picture purposes.

(3) “Clip use” means a use of any portion of a motion picture, other than the qualified motion picture, used in the qualified motion picture.

(4) “Credit certificate” means the certificate issued by the California Film Commission pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g).

(5) (A) “Employee fringe benefits” means the amount allowable as a deduction under this part to the qualified taxpayer involved in the production of the qualified motion picture, exclusive of any amounts contributed by employees, for any year during the production period with respect to any of the following:

(i) Employer contributions under any pension, profit-sharing, annuity, or similar plan.

(ii) Employer-provided coverage under any accident or health plan for employees.

(iii) The employer’s cost of life or disability insurance provided to employees.

(B) Any amount treated as wages under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (21) shall not be taken into account under this paragraph.

(6) (A) “Independent film” means a motion picture with a minimum budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) that is produced by a company that is not publicly traded and publicly traded companies do not own, directly or indirectly, more than 25 percent of the producing company.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and only for purposes of the credit allowed in subdivision (k), a motion picture with a minimum budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) that is produced by a company that is not publicly traded and publicly traded companies do not own, directly or indirectly, more than 30 percent of the producing company.

(7) “Jobs ratio” means the amount of qualified wages paid to qualified individuals divided by the amount of tax credit, not including any additional credit allowed pursuant to subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), as computed by the California Film Commission. For the purposes of the calculation of the jobs ratio only, 70 percent of qualified expenditures for visual effects paid to third-party vendors for work performed in California shall be deemed to be qualified wages paid to a qualified individual.

(8) “Licensing” means any grant of rights to distribute the qualified motion picture, in whole or in part.

(9) “New use” means any use of a motion picture in a medium other than the medium for which it was initially created.

(10) “Pilot for a new television series” means the initial episode produced for a proposed television series.

(11) (A) “Postproduction” means the final activities in a qualified motion picture’s production, including editing, foley recording, automatic dialogue replacement, sound editing, scoring, music track recording by musicians and music editing, beginning and end credits, negative cutting, negative processing and duplication, the addition of sound and visual effects, sound mixing, film-to-tape transfers,
 encoding, and color correction.

(B) “Postproduction” does not include the manufacture or shipping of release prints or their equivalent.

(12) “Preproduction” means the process of preparation for actual physical production which begins after a qualified motion picture has received a firm agreement of financial commitment, or is greenlit, with, for example, the establishment of a dedicated production office, the hiring of key crew members, and includes, but is not limited to, activities that include location scouting and execution of contracts with vendors of equipment and stage space.

(13) “Principal photography” means the phase of production during which the motion picture is actually shot, as distinguished from preproduction and postproduction.

(14) “Production period” means the period beginning with preproduction and ending upon completion of postproduction.

(15) “Qualified entity” means a personal service corporation as defined in Section 269A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, a payroll services corporation, or any entity receiving qualified wages with respect to services performed by a qualified individual.

(16) “Qualified expenditures” means amounts paid or incurred for tangible personal property purchased or leased, and used, within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture and payments, including qualified wages, for services performed within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(17) (A) “Qualified individual” means any individual who performs services during the production
 period in an activity related to the production of a qualified motion picture.

(B) “Qualified individual” shall not include either of the following:

(i) Any individual related to the qualified taxpayer as described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of Section 51(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in Section 416(i)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the qualified taxpayer.

(18) (A) “Qualified motion picture” means a motion picture that is produced for distribution to the general public, regardless of medium, that is one of the following:

(i) A feature with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(ii) A miniseries consisting of two or more episodes, each longer than 40 minutes of running time, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(iii) A new television series of episodes longer than 40 minutes each of running time, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(iv) An independent film.

(v) A television series that relocated to California.

(vi) (I) A pilot for a new television series that is longer than 40 minutes of running time, exclusive of commercials, that is
 produced in California, and with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000). For purposes of the credit allowed in subdivision (k), this subclause shall only apply for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025.

(II) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and only for purposes of the credit allowed in subdivision (k), a pilot for a new live action or animated series that is at least 20 minutes of running time, exclusive of commercials, and is produced in California with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(vii) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and only for purposes of the credit allowed in subdivision (k), a live action or animated series, averaging across a season at least 20 minutes of running time per episode, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in California, with
 a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(viii) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and only for purposes of the credit allowed in subdivision (k), an animated film that is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(ix) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and only for purposes of the credit allowed in subdivision (k), a large-scale competition show, not including traditional reality, game shows, talk shows, or docufollow television programming, that is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(B) To qualify as a “qualified motion picture,” all of the following conditions shall be satisfied:

(i) At least 75 percent of the principal photography days occur wholly in California or 75 percent of the production budget is incurred for payment for services performed within the state and the purchase or rental of property used within the state.

(ii) Production of the qualified motion picture is completed within 30 months from the date on which the qualified taxpayer’s application is approved by the California Film Commission. For purposes of this section, a qualified motion picture is “completed” when the process of postproduction has been finished.

(iii) The copyright for the motion picture is registered with the United States Copyright Office pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code.

(iv) Principal photography of the qualified motion picture
 commences after the date on which the application is approved by the California Film Commission, but no later than 180 days after the date of that approval if the qualified motion picture has a budget with qualified expenditures of less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), and no later than 240 days after the date of that approval in the case of a qualified motion picture with a budget of qualified expenditures with at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), unless death, disability, or disfigurement of the director or of a principal cast member; an act of God, including, but not limited to, fire, flood, earthquake, storm, hurricane, or other natural disaster; terrorist activities; or government sanction has directly prevented a production’s ability to begin principal photography within the prescribed 180- or 240-day commencement period.

(C) For the purposes of subparagraph (A), in computing the total wages paid or
 incurred for the production of a qualified motion picture, all amounts paid or incurred by all persons or entities that share in the costs of the qualified motion picture shall be aggregated.

(D) “Qualified motion picture” shall not include commercial advertising, music videos, a motion picture produced for private noncommercial use, such as weddings, graduations, or as part of an educational course and made by students, a news program, current events or public events program, talk show, game show, sporting event or activity, awards show, telethon or other production that solicits funds, reality television program, except as specified in clause (ix) of subparagraph (A), clip-based programming if more than 50 percent of the content is comprised of licensed footage, documentaries, variety programs, daytime dramas, strip shows, one-half hour (air time) episodic television shows, except as specified in clause (vii) of subparagraph (A), or any
 production that falls within the recordkeeping requirements of Section 2257 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(19) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer, or a single member limited liability company that is disregarded for tax purposes pursuant to Section 23038, who has paid or incurred qualified expenditures, participated in the Career Readiness requirement in Section 17053.95, and has been issued a credit certificate by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) In the case of any pass-thru entity, the determination of whether a taxpayer is a qualified taxpayer under this section shall be made at the entity level and any credit under this section is not allowed to the pass-thru entity but shall be passed through to the partners or shareholders in accordance with applicable provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001)
 or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). For purposes of this paragraph, “pass-thru entity” means any entity taxed as a partnership or “S” corporation.

(20) “Qualified visual effects” means visual effects where at least 75 percent or a minimum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of the qualified expenditures for the visual effects are paid or incurred in California.

(21) (A) “Qualified wages” means all of the following:

(i) Any wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code that were paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of a qualified motion picture with respect to a qualified individual for services performed on the qualified motion picture production within this state.

(ii) The portion of any employee fringe benefits paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of the qualified motion picture that are properly allocable to qualified wage amounts described in clauses (i), (iii), and (iv).

(iii) Any payments made to a qualified entity for services performed in this state by qualified individuals within the meaning of paragraph (17).

(iv) Remuneration paid to an independent contractor who is a qualified individual for services performed within this state by that qualified individual.

(B) “Qualified wages” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Expenses, including wages, related to new use, reuse, clip use, licensing, secondary markets, or
 residual compensation, or the creation of any ancillary product, including, but not limited to, a soundtrack album, toy, game, trailer, or teaser.

(ii) Expenses, including wages, paid or incurred with respect to acquisition, development, turnaround, or any rights thereto.

(iii) Expenses, including wages, related to financing, overhead, marketing, promotion, or distribution of a qualified motion picture.

(iv) Expenses, including wages, paid per person per qualified motion picture for writers, directors, music directors, music composers, music supervisors, producers, and performers, other than background actors with no scripted lines.

(22) “Recurring television series” means any television series that was previously approved and issued a credit allocation
 letter under this section.

(23) “Residual compensation” means supplemental compensation paid at the time that a motion picture is exhibited through new use, reuse, clip use, or in secondary markets, as distinguished from payments made during production.

(24) “Reuse” means any use of a qualified motion picture in the same medium for which it was created, following the initial use in that medium.

(25) “Secondary markets” means media in which a qualified motion picture is exhibited following the initial media in which it is exhibited.

(26) “Television series that relocated to California” means a television series, without regard to episode length or initial media exhibition, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode,
 that filmed at least 75 percent of principal photography days in its most recent season outside of California or has filmed all seasons outside of California and for which the taxpayer certifies that the credit provided pursuant to this section is the primary reason for relocating to California.

(27) “Visual effects” means the creation, alteration, or enhancement of images that cannot be captured on a set or location during live action photography and therefore is accomplished in postproduction. It includes, but is not limited to, matte paintings, animation, set extensions, computer-generated objects, characters and environments, compositing (combining two or more elements in a final image), and wire removals. “Visual effects” does not include fully animated projects, whether created by traditional or digital means.

(c) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified taxpayer may sell any credit allowed under this section that is attributable to an independent film, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), to an unrelated party.

(B) The qualified taxpayer shall report to the Franchise Tax Board prior to the sale of the credit, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, all required information regarding the purchase and sale of the credit, including the social security or other taxpayer identification number of the unrelated party to whom the credit has been sold, the face amount of the credit sold, and the amount of consideration received by the qualified taxpayer for the sale of the credit.

(C) A credit shall not be sold pursuant to this paragraph to more than one taxpayer, nor may the credit be resold by the unrelated party to another taxpayer or other party.

(D) A party that has acquired tax credits under this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements of this section.

(E) In no event may a qualified taxpayer assign or sell any tax credit to the extent the tax credit allowed by this section is claimed on any tax return of the qualified taxpayer.

(F) In the event that both the taxpayer originally allocated a credit under this section by the California Film Commission and a taxpayer to whom the credit has been sold both claim the same amount of credit on their tax returns, the Franchise Tax Board may disallow the credit of either taxpayer, so long as the statute of limitations upon assessment remains open.

(G) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this subdivision.

(H) Subdivision (g) of Section 17039 shall not apply to any credit sold pursuant to this paragraph.

(I) For purposes of this subdivision, the unrelated party or parties that purchase a credit pursuant to this paragraph shall be treated as a qualified taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) (A) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding 14 taxable years, until the credit has been exhausted.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a qualified taxpayer may claim the credit or apply the credit carryover for any of the 10th through the 15th taxable years following the taxable year in which the credit was allowed under subdivision (a) only if the qualified taxpayer, an entity directly or indirectly owned
 by the qualified taxpayer, or an entity directly or indirectly owned by an entity that directly or indirectly owns the qualified taxpayer, is an active participant, as defined in subparagraph (C), for that taxable year.

(ii) Failure to satisfy clause (i) for a taxable year shall not preclude the carryover of the unused credit to a subsequent taxable year within the carryover period described in this paragraph, and shall not extend that carryover period.

(C) “Active participant” means an entity or individual that, for the taxable year for which the credit is being claimed or credit carryover is being applied, has an outstanding credit allocation under Section 17053.98.1 or 23698.1 for which a credit certificate has not yet been issued, or has been issued a credit certificate under Section 17053.98.1 or 23698.1 for the taxable year.

(D) This paragraph shall apply to credit carryovers beginning on January 1, 2025, including a
 credit carryover for which the carryover period had expired under this section as it read immediately before the operative date of this paragraph.

(d) (1) No credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section unless the qualified taxpayer provides the following to the California Film Commission:

(A) Identification of each qualified individual.

(B) The specific start and end dates of production.

(C) The total wages paid.

(D) The total amount of qualified wages paid to qualified individuals.

(E) Aggregate data for individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages by clause
 (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b), including their gender, ethnic, and racial makeup.

(F) The copyright registration number, as reflected on the certificate of registration issued under the authority of Section 410 of Title 17 of the United States Code, relating to registration of claim and issuance of certificate. The registration number shall be provided on the return claiming the credit.

(G) The total amounts paid or incurred to purchase or lease tangible personal property used in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(H) Information to substantiate its qualified expenditures.

(I) Information required by the California Film Commission under regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (g) necessary to verify the
 amount of credit claimed.

(J) Data regarding the diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant on the qualified motion picture, as described in subdivision (g).

(K) Documentation verifying completion of the Career Readiness requirement.

(L) Documentation verifying that the qualified taxpayer paid a fee as described in subdivision (e).

(2) (A) Based on the information provided in paragraph (1), the California Film Commission shall recompute the jobs ratio previously computed in subdivision (g) and compare this recomputed jobs ratio to the jobs ratio that the qualified taxpayer previously listed on the application submitted pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) (i) If the California Film Commission determines that the jobs ratio has been reduced by more than 10 percent for a qualified motion picture, the California Film Commission shall reduce the amount of credit allowed by an equal percentage, unless the qualified taxpayer demonstrates, and the California Film Commission determines, that reasonable cause exists for the jobs ratio reduction.

(ii) If the California Film Commission determines that the jobs ratio has been reduced by more than 20 percent for a qualified motion picture, the California Film Commission shall not accept an application described in subdivision (g) from that qualified taxpayer or any member of the qualified taxpayer’s controlled group for a period of not less than one year from the date of that determination, unless the qualified taxpayer demonstrates, and the California Film Commission determines, that reasonable cause exists for the
 jobs ratio reduction.

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable cause” means unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the qualified taxpayer, such as, but not limited to, the cancellation of a television series prior to the completion of the scheduled number of episodes or other similar circumstances as determined by the California Film Commission in regulations to be adopted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) (1) (A) Subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the California Film Commission shall adopt rules and regulations to implement a pilot Career Pathways Training program including a fee to be paid by the qualified taxpayer, if the qualified taxpayer receives a credit under this section, to fund technical skills
 training to individuals from underserved communities for entry into film and television industry jobs. The California Film Commission shall (i) identify a not-for-profit fiscal agent with direct relationships to industry skills training programs to manage the funds; and (ii) engage labor-management jointly administered training programs with skills training focused on the entertainment industry to implement the program with California Film Commission approval and oversight. With regard to the Career Readiness requirement in Section 17053.95, the California Film Commission shall identify training and public service opportunities that may include, but not be limited to, hiring interns, public service announcements, and community outreach shall continue. The California Film Commission may prescribe rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including, subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and clause (iv) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), and including
 any rules and regulations necessary to establish procedures, processes, requirements, application fee structure, and rules identified in or required to implement this section, including credit and logo requirements and credit allocation procedures over multiple fiscal years where the qualified taxpayer is producing a series of features that will be filmed concurrently.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, prior to preparing a notice of proposed action pursuant to Section 11346.4 of the Government Code and prior to making any revision to the proposed regulation other than a change that is nonsubstantial or solely grammatical in nature, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall first approve the proposed regulation or proposed change to a proposed regulation regarding allocating the credit pursuant to subdivision (i), computing the jobs ratio as described in subdivisions (d) and (g), and defining “reasonable cause” pursuant
 to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(2) (A) Implementation of this section for the 2020–21 fiscal year is deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare and, therefore, the California Film Commission is hereby authorized to adopt emergency regulations to implement this section during the 2020–21 fiscal year in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development to approve emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) The California Film
 Commission shall not be required to prepare an economic impact analysis pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) with regard to any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the qualified taxpayer fails to provide the copyright registration number as required in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the credit shall be disallowed and assessed and collected under Section 19051 until the procedures are satisfied.

(g) For purposes of this section, the California Film Commission shall do the following:

(1) Subject to the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2), on or after July 1, 2020, and before July 1, 2025, in two or more allocation periods
 per fiscal year, allocate tax credits to applicants.

(2) (A) Establish a procedure for applicants to file with the California Film Commission a written application, on a form jointly prescribed by the California Film Commission and the Franchise Tax Board for the allocation of the tax credit. The application shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(i) The budget for the motion picture production.

(ii) The number of production days.

(iii) A financing plan for the production.

(iv) The diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant, including, but not limited to, the ethnic and racial makeup of the individuals employed by the applicant
 during the production of the qualified motion picture, to the extent possible.

(v) All members of a combined reporting group, if known at the time of the application.

(vi) The amount of qualified wages the applicant expects to pay to qualified individuals.

(vii) The amount of tax credit the applicant computes the qualified motion picture will receive, applying the applicable credit percentages described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(viii) A statement establishing that the tax credit described in this section is a significant factor in the applicant’s choice of location for the qualified motion picture. The statement shall include information about whether the qualified motion picture is at risk of not being filmed or specify the jurisdiction or
 jurisdictions in which the qualified motion picture will be located in the absence of the tax credit. The statement shall be signed by an officer or executive of the applicant.

(ix) The applicant’s written policy against unlawful harassment, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment, which includes procedures for reporting and investigating harassment claims, a phone number for an individual who will be responsible for receiving harassment claims, and a statement that the company will not retaliate against an individual who reports harassment. The applicant shall also indicate how the policy will be distributed to employees and include a summary of education training resources, including the prohibition against, and prevention and correction of, sexual harassment and remedies available.

(x) The ethnic and racial makeup and gender of individuals whose wages are excluded from
 qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b).

(xi) A summary of the applicant’s voluntary programs to increase the representation of minorities and women in the job classifications that are not included in qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b) and information about how these programs are publicized to interested parties. The officer or executive referenced in clause (x) who is signing the statement shall provide additional information about these programs, if needed and upon request, to the California Film Commission.

(xii) Any other information deemed relevant by the California Film Commission or the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Establish criteria, consistent with the requirements of this section, for
 allocating tax credits.

(C) Determine and designate applicants who meet the requirements of this section.

(D) (i) For purposes of allocating the credit amounts subject to the categories described in subdivision (i) in any fiscal year, the California Film Commission shall do all of the following:

(ii) For each allocation date and for each category, list each applicant from highest to lowest according to the jobs ratio as computed by the California Film Commission.

(iii) Subject to the applicable credit percentage, allocate the credit to each applicant according to the highest jobs ratio, working down the list, until the credit amount is exhausted.

(iv) (I) Pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (e), the California Film Commission may increase the jobs ratio by up to 25 percent if a qualified motion picture increases economic activity in California according to criteria developed by the California Film Commission that would include, but not be limited to, such factors as, the amount of the production and postproduction spending in California, the utilization of scoring musicians in California, and other criteria measuring economic impact in California as determined by the California Film Commission.

(II) For qualified motion pictures that are described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k), the jobs ratio shall be equal to the product of the jobs ratio calculated in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) and 133 percent.

(v) Notwithstanding any other law, any television series, relocating
 television series, or any new television series based on a pilot for a new television series that has been approved and issued a credit allocation by the California Film Commission under this section, including subdivision (k), Section 23698, including subdivision (k), or Section 17053.95, 23695, 17053.85, or 23685 shall be issued a credit for each subsequent season, for the life of that television series whenever credits are allocated within a fiscal year. For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025, the California Film Commission shall limit the amount of credits any recurring television series receives in a subsequent season to no more than the amount reserved in its prior fiscal year Credit Allocation Letter or Letters, or if no amounts were reserved in the prior fiscal year, the most immediate prior fiscal year in which a Credit Allocation Letter or Letters were received. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the California Film Commission shall limit the amount of credits any
 recurring television series receives in a subsequent season to no more than the recurring television allocation amount, as defined in paragraph (23) of subdivision (b) of Section 17053.98.1. In the event that insufficient tax credits are available to fund all recurring television series pursuant to this clause for any fiscal year or in the event the California Film Commission projects, in collaboration with the Department of Finance, that there will be insufficient tax credits available to fund all recurring television series in either of the subsequent two fiscal years, the California Film Commission shall make the following adjustments in the order given until the shortfall, or any projected shortfall for the two subsequent fiscal years, for recurring television series is eliminated:

(I) Notwithstanding clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the
 credit amounts allocated to the relocating television series category to recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall or projected shortfall is eliminated.

(II) Notwithstanding clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit amounts allocated to a new television series to recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall or projected shortfall is eliminated.

(III) Notwithstanding clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit allocations from the features category to the recurring television series category for that fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated.

(IV) Allocate up to
 25 percent of total credit allocations that would otherwise be allocated in the 2024–25 fiscal year to recurring television series in the current fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated. Any amounts transferred for allocation in the current fiscal year shall be subtracted from the amount allowed to be allocated in the 2024–25 fiscal year as specified in subdivision (i). Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the credit allocations that are subtracted from 2024–25 shall not be certified until July 1, 2025, or later.

(V) The California Film Commission shall consult with the qualified taxpayers who are producing the recurring television series for purposes of negotiating a minimally impactful reduction in the amount of credits awarded to each recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated.

(E) Subject to the annual cap and the allocation credit
 amounts based on categories described in subdivision (i), allocate an aggregate amount of credits under this section and Section 23698, and allocate any carryover of unallocated or unused credits from prior years and Sections 17053.85, 17053.95, 23685, and 23695, and the amount of any credits reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) Certify tax credits allocated to qualified taxpayers.

(A) Establish a verification procedure to update the information in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The amounts of qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the applicant.

(ii) The diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant.

(iii) The ethnic and racial makeup and gender of individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages by clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (21) of subdivision (b).
